Missouri, session 2026, SB1503.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 306.030, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 306.030,
to read as follows:
306.030. 1. The owner of each vessel requiring
numbering by this state shall file an application for number
with the department of revenue on forms provided by it. The
application shall contain a full description of the vessel,
factory number or serial number, together with a statement
of the applicant's source of title and of any liens or
encumbrances on the vessel. For good cause shown the
director of revenue may extend the period of time for making
such application. The director of revenue shall use
reasonable diligence in ascertaining whether the facts
stated in such application are true, and, if satisfied that
the applicant is the lawful owner of such vessel, or
otherwise entitled to have the same registered in his or her
name, shall thereupon issue an appropriate certificate of
title over the director's signature and sealed with the seal
of the director's office, procured and used for such
purpose, and a certificate of number stating the number
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1503 2
awarded to the vessel. The application shall include a
provision stating that the applicant will consent to any
inspection necessary to determine compliance with the
provisions of this chapter and shall be signed by the owner
of the vessel and shall be accompanied by the fee specified
in subsection 10 of this section. The owner shall paint on
or attach to each side of the bow of the vessel the
identification number in a manner as may be prescribed by
rules and regulations of the division of water safety in
order that it may be clearly visible. The number shall be
maintained in legible condition. The certificate of number
shall be pocket size and shall be available at all times for
inspection on the vessel for which issued, whenever the
vessel is in operation. The operator of a vessel in which
such certificate of number is not available for inspection
by the water patrol division or, if the operator cannot be
determined, the person who is the registered owner of the
vessel shall be subject to the penalties provided in section
306.210. Vessels owned by the state or a political
subdivision shall be registered but no fee shall be assessed
for such registration.
2. Each new vessel sold in this state after January 1,
1970, shall have die stamped on or within three feet of the
transom or stern a factory number or serial number.
3. The owner of any vessel already covered by a number
in full force and effect which has been awarded to it
pursuant to then operative federal law or a federally
approved numbering system of another state shall record the
number prior to operating the vessel on the waters of this
state in excess of the sixty-day reciprocity period provided
for in section 306.080. The recordation and payment of
registration fee shall be in the manner and pursuant to the

SB 1503 3
procedure required for the award of a number under
subsection 1 of this section. No additional or substitute
number shall be issued unless the number is a duplicate of
an existing Missouri number.
4. In the event that an agency of the United States
government shall have in force an overall system of
identification numbering for vessels within the United
States, the numbering system employed pursuant to this
chapter by the department of revenue shall be in conformity
therewith.
5. All records of the department of revenue made and
kept pursuant to this section shall be public records.
6. A permanent certificate of number may be issued
upon application and payment of three times the fee
specified for the vessel under this section and three times
any processing fee applicable to a three-year certificate of
number for the vessel. Permanent certificates of number
shall not be transferred to any other person or vessel, or
displayed on any vessel other than the vessel for which it
was issued, and shall continue in force and effect until
terminated or discontinued in accordance with the provisions
of this chapter. Every other certificate of number awarded
pursuant to this chapter shall continue in force and effect
for a period of three years unless sooner terminated or
discontinued in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter. Certificates of number may be renewed by the owner
in the same manner provided for in the initial securing of
the same or in accordance with the provisions of sections
306.010 to 306.030.
7. The department of revenue shall fix the days and
months of the year on which certificates of number due to
expire during the calendar year shall lapse and no longer be

SB 1503 4
of any force and effect unless renewed pursuant to this
chapter and may stagger such dates in order to distribute
the workload.
8. When applying for or renewing a vessel's
certificate of number, the owner shall submit a paid
personal property tax receipt for the tax year which
immediately precedes the year in which the application is
made or the year in which the renewal is due and which
reflects that the vessel being renewed is listed as personal
property and that all personal property taxes, including
delinquent taxes from prior years, have been paid, or a
statement certified by the county or township in which the
owner's property was assessed showing that the state and
county tangible personal property taxes for such previous
tax year and all delinquent taxes due have been paid by the
applicant or that no such taxes were due.
9. When applying for or renewing a certificate of
registration for a vessel documented with the United States
100 Coast Guard under section 306.016, owners of vessels shall
101 submit a paid personal property tax receipt for the tax year
102 which immediately precedes the year in which the application
103 is made or the renewal is due and which reflects that the
104 vessel is listed as personal property and that all personal
105 property taxes, including delinquent taxes from prior years,
106 have been paid, or a statement certified by the county or
107 township in which the owner's property was assessed showing
108 that the state and county tangible personal property taxes
109 for such previous tax year and all delinquent taxes due have
110 been paid by the applicant or that no such taxes were due.
111 10. The fee to accompany each application for a
112 certificate of number is:

SB 1503 5
113 For vessels under 16 feet in length $25.00
114 For vessels at least 16 feet in length but $55.00
115 less than 26 feet in length
116 For vessels at least 26 feet in length but $100.00
117 less than 40 feet in length
118 For vessels at least 40 feet and over $150.00
119 11. The certificate of title and certificate of number
120 issued by the director of revenue shall be manufactured in a
121 manner to prohibit as nearly as possible the ability to
122 alter, counterfeit, duplicate, or forge such certificate
123 without ready detection.
124 12. [For fiscal years ending before July 1, 2019, the
125 first two million dollars collected annually under the
126 provisions of this section shall be deposited into the state
127 general revenue fund. All fees collected under the
128 provisions of this section in excess of two million dollars
129 annually shall be deposited in the water patrol division
130 fund and shall be used exclusively for the water patrol
131 division.
132 13. Beginning July 1, 2019, the first one million
133 dollars collected annually under the provisions of this
134 section shall be deposited into the state general revenue
135 fund.] All fees collected under the provisions of this
136 section [in excess of one million dollars annually] on or
137 after August 28, 2026, shall be deposited in the water
138 patrol division fund and shall be used exclusively for the
139 water patrol division.
140 [14.] 13. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection
141 10 of this section, vessels at least sixteen feet in length
142 but less than twenty-eight feet in length, that are

SB 1503 6
143 homemade, constructed out of wood, and have a beam of five
144 feet or less, shall pay a fee of fifty-five dollars which
145 shall accompany each application for a certification number.
✓